Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-4411
Temporary license.

(1) A behavior analyst or an assistant behavior analyst who is licensed in another jurisdiction or certified by the certifying entity to practice independently and who provides applied behavior analysis services in the State of Nebraska on a short-term basis may apply for a temporary license. An applicant for a temporary license shall submit evidence that the practice in Nebraska will be temporary as determined by the board according to rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to section 38-126. The department shall issue a temporary license under this subsection only if the department verifies the applicant's licensure or certification status with the relevant entity.

(2) An applicant for licensure as a licensed behavior analyst or as a licensed assistant behavior analyst under the Behavior Analyst Practice Act who is a military spouse may apply for a temporary license as provided in section 38-129.01.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 11.